Connecticut, session 2026, SB00066.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to (1) establish a
personal income tax deduction of up to twenty-five thousand dollars for
the amount of tips or gratuities declared by a taxpayer for the taxable
years commencing on or after January 1, 2026, and prior to January 1,
2029, and (2) provide for income threshold phase-outs of the deduction
for adjusted gross income over one hundred fifty thousand dollars for
single filers and three hundred thousand dollars for married individuals
filing jointly.